src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
monnjâkiistâ+Sem/Dummytag:monnjâ#ki^RVstu S_AAIGA "" ;
čunoi+Sem/Dummytag:čunn C_CUNOI "hiekka" ;
juurdâceelhâ+Sem/Dummytag:juurdâ#ce^RVlkk4u S_AAIGA "ajatelma" ;
ryebbicuábui+Sem/Ani:ryebbi#cuobbu C_PUASUI "rupikonna" ;
kielâpeerâ+Sem/Dummytag:kielâ#pe^RVrru S_AAJA "kielikunta" ;
arvetävgipeerâ+Sem/Group_Hum:arve#tävgi#pe^RVrru S_AAJA "sateenkaariperhe" ;
karrii+Sem/Dummytag:karri S_KARRII "räme" ;
ollâteedâ+Sem/Dummytag:ollâ#te^RVddu S_AAJA "korkeapaine" ;
oljoteedâ+Sem/Dummytag:oljo#te^RVddu S_AAJA "öljynpaine" ;
válduceelhâ+Sem/Dummytag:váldu#ce^RVlkk4u S_AAIGA "päälause" ;
paaštâ+Sem/Dummytag:pa^RVštu S_AAIGA "paiste" ;
peles+Sem/Dummytag:piällás^ÁE C_PELES "pieli" ;
peles+Use/NG+Sem/Dummytag:piällás^ÁE  C_PELES "pieli" ;
lasâpeles+Sem/Dummytag:lasâ#piällás^ÁE C_PELES "ikkunanpieli" ;
uksâpeles+Sem/Dummytag:uksâ#piällás^ÁE C_PELES "ovenpieli" ;
naarvâ+Sem/Dummytag:na^RVrvu S_AAIGA "korkkijälsi" ;
maadânuorttii+Sem/Dummytag:maadâ#nuortti S_KARRII "kaakko" ;
váimumorčes+Sem/Dummytag:váimu#morččás^ÁE C_MORCES "onttolaskimo" ;
pajeváimumorčes+Sem/Dummytag:pajeváimu#morččás^ÁE C_MORCES "yläonttolaskimo" ;
elettempuásui+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:elettem#po^RVcc4u C_PUASUI "eloporo" ;
pähkinmiestâ+Sem/Plant:pähkin#miestu S_AAIGA "pähkinäpensas" ;
räjialmai+Sem/Hum:räji#alma C_ALMAI "rajamies" ;
postalmai+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:post#álma C_ALMAI "postimies" ;
postalmai+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:post'álma C_ALMAI "postimies" ;
puálualmai+Sem/Hum:puálu#alma C_ALMAI "palomies" ;
transalmai+Sem/Hum:trans#alma C_ALMAI "transmies" ;
vuáláčaalâ+Sem/Dummytag:vuálá#ča^RVllu S_AAJA "allekirjoitus" ;
kistuuh+Sem/Dummytag:ki^RVstu S_AAIGA_PL "rukkaset" ;
ovdâloovdâ+Sem/Dummytag:ovdâ#lo^RVvdu S_AAIGA "esirippu" ;
koskâalmai+Sem/Hum:koskâ#alma C_ALMAI ;
velgalmai+Sem/Hum:velg#alma C_ALMAI ;
ákšualmai+Sem/Hum:ákšu#alma C_ALMAI ;
iđedâskuávsui+Sem/Dummytag:iđedâs#kuok4su C_KUAVSUI ;
cuábui+Sem/Ani:cuobbu C_PUASUI "sammakko" ; ! YAML ¢cuobbuin, cuobbust, cuobbui, cuobbuu tags_via_apertium
iiđeedkuávsui+Sem/Time:iiđeed#kuok4su C_KUAVSUI "aamunkoi" ; ! tags_via_apertium
kanadačuánjá+Sem/Ani-bird:kanada#čuánnjá C_CUANJA "kanadanhanhi" ;
kiärdučuánjá+Sem/Ani-bird:kiärdu#čuánnjá C_CUANJA "sepelhanhi" ;
kolbâcuábui+Sem/Ani:kolbâ#cuobbu C_PUASUI "kilpikonna" ; ! tags_via_apertium
kunnâpuájui+Sem/Plant:kunnâ#po^RVi4ju C_KUAVSUI "tuhkapaju" ;
kuávsui+Sem/Time:kuok4su C_KUAVSUI "koitto" ; ! YAML ¢kuoksuin, kuoksust, kuoksui, kuoksuu tags_via_apertium
laavlâ+Sem/Prod-audio:la^RVvlu S_AAIGA "laulu" ; !YAML ¢lavluin, lavlust, lavlui, lavluu tags_via_apertium
laavlâčuánjá+Sem/Ani-bird:laavlâ#čuánnjá C_CUANJA "kiljuhanhi" ;	! tags_via_apertium
laavlâčuáŋá+Sem/Ani-bird:laavlâ#čuáŋŋá C_CUANJA ;
o-maadâ+Sem/Cat:o-ma^RVddu S_AAJA "tyvi" ; 
merâčuánjá+Sem/Ani-bird:merâ#čuánnjá C_CUANJA "merihanhi" ;
morčes+Sem/Body:morččás^ÁE C_MORCES "laskimo" ; !YAML tags_via_apertium
muotâčuánjá+Sem/Ani-bird:muotâ#čuánnjá C_CUANJA "lumihanhi" ;
njurgoi+Sem/Ani-bird:njurg C_CUNOI "mustalintu" ;
njuárui+Sem/Plant:njuorru C_PUASUI "purolähdesammal" ; !¢njuorruin, njuorrust, njuorrui, njuorruu tags_via_apertium
nuorttii+Sem/Wthr:nuortti S_KARRII "itätuuli" ;	!¢nuorttijn, nuorttist, nuorttijân, nuorttii tags_via_apertium
puágui+Sem/Ani-bird:po^RVggu C_PUASUI "pyy" ; !¢pogguin, poggust, poggui, pogguu tags_via_apertium
stuorrâčiävžui+Sem/Ani-bird:stuorrâ#če^RVvžu C_PUASUI "valkoviklo" ; ! tags_via_apertium
talviipuájui+Sem/Plant:talvii#po^RVi4ju C_KUAVSUI "talvikkipaju" ;
tavenuorttii+Sem/Wthr:tave#nuortti S_KARRII "koillinen" ;	! tags_via_apertium
tuodârkuovgispuájui+Sem/Plant:tuodârkuovgis#po^RVi4ju C_KUAVSUI "" ;
tuodârčuánjá+Sem/Ani-bird:tuodâr#čuánnjá C_CUANJA "tundrahanhi" ;
vielgisnierčuánjá+Sem/Ani-bird:vielgisnier#čuánnjá C_CUANJA "valkoposkihanhi" ;	! tags_via_apertium
vuodâ+Sem/Clth:vuoddu S_AAJA "paula" ; ! tags_via_apertium
vyevdičiävžui+Sem/Ani-bird:vyevdi#če^RVvžu C_PUASUI "metsäviklo" ;
äššialmai+Sem/Hum:äšši#alma C_ALMAI "asiamies" ; ! tags_via_apertium
čunoipuájui+Sem/Plant:čunoi#po^RVi4ju C_KUAVSUI "hietikkopaju" ;
čápudeijeepuájui+Sem/Plant:čápudei4jee#po^RVi4ju C_KUAVSUI "" ;
